Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB294.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "Success Sequence" means the following series of
evidence-based sequential milestones shown to help young adults achieve
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2025 8:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 472
economic prosperity:
(a) Obtaining at least a high school diploma and acquiring additional training
in preparation for entering the workforce;
(b) Securing full-time employment; and
(c) Waiting until marriage to begin having children.
(2) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each year thereafter, all school
districts shall provide:
(a) Instruction in the Success Sequence to all students in grade seven (7) and
grade ten (10); and
(b) Access to instruction in the Success Sequence for students who may not
have received such instruction during grade ten (10) due to enrollment
within the school after grade ten (10) or otherwise.
(3) The superintendent of each school district containing students in grade seven (7)
or grade ten (10) shall determine curricula for course offerings, programs, or a
combination of course offerings and programs that are aligned with the Success
Sequence academic standards promulgated by the board.
(4) The department shall develop guidelines that provide direction to local schools in
implementing curriculum aligned with the Success Sequence academic
standards. Such guidelines shall:
(a) Include grade-level appropriate instruction describing the positive personal
and societal outcomes associated with the Success Sequence; and
(b) Incorporate evidence drawn from seminal academic studies on the Success
Sequence, including but not limited to:
1. Assessing the Benefits of the Success Sequence for Economic Self-
Sufficiency and Family Stability by Hande Inanc, Ariella Spitzer, and
Brian Goesling for the United States Department of Health and
Human Services;
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2025 8:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 472
2. Creating an Opportunity Society by Ron Haskins and Isabel Sawhill
of The Brookings Institution; and
3. The Millennial Success Sequence by Wendy Wang and Brad Wilcox
of the American Enterprise Institute and the Institute for Family
Studies.
(5) The department or a superintendent may partner with Kentucky-based nonprofit
organizations with an established track record of providing instruction on the
Success Sequence in the development of the curriculum required by this section.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A and KRS 156.160 to establish academic standards for courses and
programs in the Success Sequence.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2025 8:31 AM Jacketed